Utah statutes.
17-52-402.   Plan may propose changing forms of county government -- Plan may propose change of structural form.

(1) (a) Each optional plan shall propose changing the form of county government to:

(i)  the county commission form under Section 17-52-501;

(ii)  the expanded county commission form under Section 17-52-502;

(iii)  the county executive and council form under Section 17-52-504; or

(iv)  the council-manager form under Section 17-52-505.

(b)  An optional plan adopted after May 1, 2000 may not:

(i)  propose changing the form of government to a form not included in Subsection (1)(a);

(ii)  provide for the nonpartisan election of elected officers;

(iii)  impose a limit on the number of terms or years that an elected officer may serve; or

(iv)  provide for elected officers to be subject to a recall election.

(2)  In addition to proposing the adoption of any one of the optional forms of county government under Subsection (1)(a), an optional plan may also propose the adoption of any one of the structural forms of county government provided under Chapter 35b, Part 3, Structural Forms of County Government.

